Massachusetts, session 194th, H1638.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 15 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out paragraph (5) and inserting in place thereof the following
paragraph:-
(5) If the attorney general or a district attorney becomes aware of a final conviction of a
member of a retirement system under circumstances which may require forfeiture of the
member’s rights to a pension, retirement allowance or return of accumulated total deductions
pursuant to this chapter, section 58 or 59 of chapter 30 or section 25 of chapter 268A, the
attorney general or district attorney shall immediately notify the commission of such conviction;
provided, however, that the commission shall not report such conviction to the member’s
retirement board or employer unless the commission: (i) has determined that the conviction
of 2

requires forfeiture of that member’s rights to a pension, retirement allowance or return of
accumulated total deductions pursuant to this chapter, section 58 or 59 of chapter 30 or section
25 of chapter 268A; and (ii) is directing that member’s retirement board or employer to take
action to effectuate such forfeiture.
of 2